Washington statutes.
RCW 39.89.040

Coordination with other programs—Improvements by private developer must meet applicable state and local laws.

(1) Public improvements that are financed with community revitalization financing may be undertaken and coordinated with other programs or efforts undertaken by the local government and other taxing districts and may be funded in part from revenue sources other than community revitalization financing.

(2) Public improvements that are constructed by a private developer must meet all applicable state and local laws.

[ 2002 c 12 s 2; 2001 c 212 s 4.]